Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2340.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2010(b) and (e) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 2010. Limited Tax Credits.--* * *(b) As used in this section:"Amounts paid." The phrase means (i) amounts actually paid, or (ii) at the taxpayer's election, amounts promised to be paid 123456789101112131415161718192021 under firm purchase contracts actually executed during any calendar year falling within the effective period of this section: Provided, however, That there shall be no duplication of "amounts paid" under this definition."Effective period." The period from January 1, 1974, to December 31, 2008, and the period after June 30, 2017, inclusive."Purchaser." A person who purchases a tax credit from a taxpayer."Qualifying capital expenditures." Amounts paid by a taxpayer during the effective period of this section for the purchase of items of plant, machinery or equipment for use by the taxpayer within this Commonwealth in the manufacture and sale of malt or brewed beverages: Provided, however, That the total amount of qualifying capital expenditures made by a taxpayer within a single calendar year shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000)."Secretary." The Secretary of Revenue of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania where not otherwise qualified."Taxpayer." A manufacturer of malt or brewed beverages claiming a tax credit or credits under this section.* * *(e) Upon receipt from a taxpayer of a certificate from the secretary issued under subsection (c), the Secretary of Revenue shall grant a tax credit or credits in the amount certified against any tax due under this article in the calendar year in which the expenditures were incurred or against any tax becoming due from the taxpayer under this article in the following [three] five calendar years. No credit shall be allowed against any tax due for any taxable period ending after December 31, 20260HB2340PN3132 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2008, and beginning before July 1, 2017.* * *(h) (1) A taxpayer, upon application to and approval by the department, may sell or assign, in whole or in part, a tax credit granted under this section. A tax credit may only be sold or assigned to a taxpayer under this article.(2) The department may issue guidelines for the approval of applications under this subsection.(3) Before approval, the department must verify that the taxpayer has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable tax years and paid any outstanding balances as determined through settlement, assessment or determination.(4) The department shall settle, assess or determine the taxpayer's tax liability within ninety days of receiving all required final returns or reports in accordance with section 806.1(a)(5) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as "The Fiscal Code."(i) (1) The purchaser of all or part of a tax credit shall immediately claim the credit in the taxable year in which the purchase or assignment occurs.(2) The tax credit may only be applied to the purchaser's tax liability under this article and may not exceed fifty per cent of the purchaser's tax liability for that taxable year.(3) A purchaser who is also a taxpayer may claim the purchased tax credit in addition to the total amount of qualifying capital expenditure the purchaser claims subject to the provisions of this section.(4) The purchaser may not carry forward, carry back or obtain a refund of the tax credit.(5) The purchaser may not sell or assign a purchased tax 20260HB2340PN3132 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credit.(6) The purchaser shall notify the department of the seller or assignor of the tax credit in compliance with specified procedures.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2340PN3132 - 4 - 12345